Maryland, session 2026, SB0417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–718.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “POLITICAL MATTERS” MEANS MATTERS RELATING TO:
(I) ELECTIONS FOR POLITICAL OFFICE;
(II) POLITICAL PARTIES;
(III) PROPOSALS TO CHANGE:
– 1 –

Ch. 221 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. LEGISLATION;
2. REGULATIONS; OR
3. PUBLIC POLICY; OR
(IV) THE DECISION TO JOIN OR SUPPORT A POLITICAL PARTY OR
POTENTIAL CIVIC, COMMUNITY, FRATERNAL, OR LABOR ORGANIZATION.
(3) “RELIGIOUS MATTERS” MEANS MATTERS RELATING TO
RELIGIOUS BELIEF, AFFILIATION, AND PRACTICE OR THE DECISION TO JOIN AND
SUPPORT A RELIGIOUS ORGANIZATION OR ASSOCIATION.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN EMPLOYER THAT:
(1) IS A RELIGIOUS CORPORATION, ORGANIZATION, OR ASSOCIATION
OR AN EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION OR SOCIETY THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE
REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE VII OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 UNDER 42 U.S.C.
§ 2000E–1(A) OR IS EXEMPT FOR EMPLOYMENT DISCRIMINATION PROTECTIONS
UNDER STATE LAW;
(2) IS A POLITICAL ORGANIZATION THAT REQUIRES ITS EMPLOYEES
TO ATTEND AN EMPLOYER–SPONSORED MEETING OR TO PARTICIPATE IN
COMMUNICATIONS WITH THE EMPLOYER OR THE EMPLOYER’S AGENTS OR OTHER
REPRESENTATIVES FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMMUNICATING THE EMPLOYER’S
POLITICAL TENETS OR PURPOSES;
(3) IS AN EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION THAT REQUIRES A STUDENT OR
AN INSTRUCTOR TO ATTEND LECTURES ON POLITICAL OR RELIGIOUS MATTERS AS
PART OF THE REGULAR COURSEWORK AT THE INSTITUTION;
(4) IS A NONPROFIT, TAX–EXEMPT TRAINING PROGRAM THAT
REQUIRES A STUDENT OR AN INSTRUCTOR TO ATTEND CLASSROOM INSTRUCTION,
COMPLETE FIELDWORK, OR PERFORM COMMUNITY SERVICE HOURS ON POLITICAL
OR RELIGIOUS MATTERS AS IT RELATES TO THE MISSION OF THE TRAINING
PROGRAM;
(5) REQUIRES EMPLOYEES TO UNDERGO TRAINING TO COMPLY WITH
FEDERAL OR STATE LAW, INCLUDING TRAINING RELATED TO THE EMPLOYER’S
OBLIGATIONS UNDER CIVIL RIGHTS LAWS AND OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH
LAWS; OR
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 221
(6) IS A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT HOLDING A NEW EMPLOYEE
ORIENTATION.
(C) AN EMPLOYER, OR THE EMPLOYER’S AGENT, REPRESENTATIVE, OR
DESIGNEE, MAY NOT:
(1) DISCHARGE, DISCIPLINE, OR OTHERWISE PENALIZE OR
THREATEN TO DISCHARGE, DISCIPLINE, OR OTHERWISE PENALIZE AN EMPLOYEE
BECAUSE THE EMPLOYEE DECLINES TO ATTEND, PARTICIPATE IN, OR LISTEN TO
COMMUNICATIONS FROM THE EMPLOYER, OR THE EMPLOYER’S AGENT,
REPRESENTATIVE, OR DESIGNEE, IN AN EMPLOYER–SPONSORED MEETING DURING
WHICH THE EMPLOYER COMMUNICATES THE OPINION OF THE EMPLOYER
REGARDING RELIGIOUS MATTERS OR POLITICAL MATTERS; OR
(2) FAIL OR REFUSE TO HIRE AN APPLICANT FOR EMPLOYMENT AS A
RESULT OF THE APPLICANT’S REFUSAL TO ATTEND OR PARTICIPATE IN AN
EMPLOYER–SPONSORED MEETING DURING WHICH THE EMPLOYER COMMUNICATES
THE OPINION OF THE EMPLOYER REGARDING RELIGIOUS MATTERS OR POLITICAL
MATTERS.
(D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT AN EMPLOYER:
(1) FROM COMMUNICATING INFORMATION THAT THE EMPLOYER IS
REQUIRED BY LAW TO COMMUNICATE;
(2) FROM CONDUCTING A MEETING THAT INVOLVES RELIGIOUS
MATTERS OR POLITICAL MATTERS IF ATTENDANCE AND PARTICIPATION ARE
VOLUNTARY;
(3) FROM COMMUNICATING TO ITS EMPLOYEES INFORMATION THAT
IS NECESSARY FOR ITS EMPLOYEES TO PERFORM THEIR JOB DUTIES;
(4) THAT IS AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, OR AN AGENT
OR OTHER REPRESENTATIVE OR DESIGNEE OF THE INSTITUTION, FROM MEETING
WITH OR PARTICIPATING IN COMMUNICATIONS WITH ITS EMPLOYEES THAT ARE
PART OF COURSEWORK, A SYMPOSIUM, OR AN ACADEMIC PROGRAM AT THE
INSTITUTION; OR
(5) THAT IS A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT FROM COMMUNICATING TO ITS
EMPLOYEES INFORMATION RELATED TO A POLICY OF THE EMPLOYER OR A LAW
THAT THE EMPLOYER IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ADMINISTERING.
– 3 –

Ch. 221 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) (1) IF AN EMPLOYEE BELIEVES THAT AN EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED
THIS SECTION, WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION, THE EMPLOYEE
MAY FILE A WRITTEN COMPLAINT WITH THE COMMISSIONER.
(2) AFTER RECEIVING A WRITTEN COMPLAINT FILED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL CONDUCT AN
INVESTIGATION AND ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE ISSUE INFORMALLY THROUGH
MEDIATION.
(3) IF THE COMMISSIONER IS UNABLE TO RESOLVE AN ISSUE
THROUGH MEDIATION AND, AFTER AN INVESTIGATION, THE COMMISSIONER
DETERMINES THAT THE EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSIONER MAY ASSESS A CIVIL PENALTY OF:
(I) FOR AN INITIAL VIOLATION, UP TO $10,000; OR
(II) FOR A SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, UP TO $25,000.
(4) IN ADDITION TO CIVIL PENALTIES ASSESSED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER MAY:
(I) ISSUE AN ORDER TO CEASE AND DESIST FROM THE
VIOLATION AND ANY FURTHER SIMILAR VIOLATIONS; OR
(II) AWARD ANY OTHER RELIEF THAT THE COMMISSIONER
DETERMINES IS APPROPRIATE, INCLUDING:
1. INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
2. COMPENSATORY DAMAGES;
3. AFFIRMATIVE RELIEF, INCLUDING:
A. THE REINSTATEMENT OF THE EMPLOYEE TO THE
EMPLOYEE’S FORMER POSITION OR AN EQUIVALENT POSITION;
B. BACK PAY AND INTEREST AMOUNTS OWED; OR
C. RESTORATION OF EMPLOYEE BENEFITS, PENSION OR
RETIREMENT ACCRUAL, AND OTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT FOR
WHICH THE EMPLOYEE WOULD HAVE BEEN ELIGIBLE; OR
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 221
4. REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND OTHER COSTS.
(5) THE COMMISSIONER MAY FILE A PETITION IN ANY CIRCUIT
COURT FOR ANY COUNTY SEEKING ENFORCEMENT OF AN ORDER UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(F) (1) EACH EMPLOYER SHALL NOTIFY THE EMPLOYER’S EMPLOYEES
OF THE REQUIREMENTS AND PROTECTIONS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION BY:
(I) POSTING THE POSTER OR NOTICE DEVELOPED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN A PLACE WHERE EMPLOYEE NOTICES ARE
CUSTOMARILY POSTED OR IN ANOTHER CONSPICUOUS PLACE ACCESSIBLE BY ALL
EMPLOYEES OF THE EMPLOYER; AND
(II) PROVIDING THE NOTICE DEVELOPED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO EACH NEW EMPLOYEE ON HIRING.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE
AVAILABLE TO EMPLOYERS A POSTER AND MODEL NOTICE THAT SUMMARIZES THE
RIGHTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING HOW TO FILE A
COMPLAINT WITH THE COMMISSIONER.
(II) THE POSTER AND MODEL NOTICE DEVELOPED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE IN ENGLISH
AND ANY OTHER LANGUAGES COMMONLY USED BY EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE.
(3) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL CONSIDER FAILURE TO COMPLY
WITH THE NOTICE REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AN AGGRAVATING FACTOR WHEN AWARDING RELIEF UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Commissioner of Labor
and Industry shall develop and make available the poster and model notice required under
§ 3–718(f)(2) of the Labor and Employment Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on
or before November 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 5 –